Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.140

Curriculum-based assessment procedures for early intervening services.

School districts may use curriculum-based assessment procedures as measures for developing academic early intervening services, as defined under part B of the federal individuals with disabilities education improvement act, and curriculum planning: PROVIDED, That the use of curriculum-based assessment procedures shall not deny a student the right to use of other assessments to determine eligibility or participation in special education programs as provided by RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.160.

[ 2007 c 115 s 14; 1991 c 116 s 4; 1990 c 33 s 131; 1987 c 398 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.03.367.]